Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Positive Alternatives for Pregnancy and Parenting Grant Program

31-2A-30.
[Reserved] Legislative authority.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 2-1/SB 193, effective July 1, 2017.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 1-1/SB 193, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Untreated chlamydial infection has been linked to problems during pregnancy, including preterm labor, premature rupture of membranes, and low birth weight. The newborn may also become infected during delivery as the baby passes through the birth canal. Exposed newborns can develop eye and lung infections; and

“(2) Untreated gonococcal infection in pregnancy has been linked to miscarriages, premature birth and low birth weight, premature rupture of membranes, and chorioamnionitis. Gonorrhea can also infect an infant during delivery as the infant passes through the birth canal. If untreated, infants can develop eye infections.”

31-2A-31.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Attending physician” means the physician who has primary responsibility at the time of reference for the treatment and care of the client.

“Client” means a person seeking or receiving pregnancy support services.

“Contract management agency” or “agency” means a nongovernmental charitable organization in this state which is a 501(c)(3) tax-exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and whose mission and practice is to promote alternatives to abortion services at no cost.

“Direct client service providers” or “providers” means nonprofit organizations with a contractual relationship with the contract management agency and that provide direct pregnancy support services to clients at no cost.

Reserved.

“Pregnancy support services” means those services that encourage childbirth instead of voluntary termination of pregnancy and which assist pregnant women or women who believe they may be pregnant to choose childbirth whether they intend to parent or select adoption for the child.

“Program” means the Positive Alternatives for Pregnancy and Parenting Grant Program.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308; Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 2-2/SB 193; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 31/SB 365.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, near the end of paragraph (3), substituted “promote” for “provide” and deleted “to medically indigent women” following “services” near the end; substituted the present provisions of paragraph (5) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Medically indigent’ means a person who is without health insurance or who has health insurance that does not cover pregnancy or related conditions for which treatment and services are sought and whose family income does not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty level as defined annually by the federal Office of Management and Budget.”; and substituted the present provisions of paragraph (8) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Trust fund’ means the Indigent Care Trust Fund created by Code Section 31-8-152.”.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, repealed the reservation of paragraph (8).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 1-1/SB 193, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Untreated chlamydial infection has been linked to problems during pregnancy, including preterm labor, premature rupture of membranes, and low birth weight. The newborn may also become infected during delivery as the baby passes through the birth canal. Exposed newborns can develop eye and lung infections; and

“(2) Untreated gonococcal infection in pregnancy has been linked to miscarriages, premature birth and low birth weight, premature rupture of membranes, and chorioamnionitis. Gonorrhea can also infect an infant during delivery as the infant passes through the birth canal. If untreated, infants can develop eye infections.”

31-2A-32.
Positive Alternatives for Pregnancy and Parenting Grant Program.

There is established within the department the Positive Alternatives for Pregnancy and Parenting Grant Program. The purpose of the program shall be to develop a state-wide effort that promotes healthy pregnancies and childbirth by awarding grants to nonprofit organizations that provide pregnancy support services.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308; Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 2-3/SB 193; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in the second sentence, deleted “grant” preceding “program” and substituted “develop a state-wide effort that promotes healthy pregnancies and childbirth” for “promote healthy pregnancies and childbirth”. The second 2017 amendment, effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “grant” preceding “program” at the beginning of the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 1-1/SB 193, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Untreated chlamydial infection has been linked to problems during pregnancy, including preterm labor, premature rupture of membranes, and low birth weight. The newborn may also become infected during delivery as the baby passes through the birth canal. Exposed newborns can develop eye and lung infections; and

“(2) Untreated gonococcal infection in pregnancy has been linked to miscarriages, premature birth and low birth weight, premature rupture of membranes, and chorioamnionitis. Gonorrhea can also infect an infant during delivery as the infant passes through the birth canal. If untreated, infants can develop eye infections.”

31-2A-33.
Administration and duties.

The department shall oversee the program and is authorized to contract with a contract management agency to administer the program.

The contract management agency selected by the department shall meet the definition of a contract management agency as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 31-2A-31 and shall:

Create a grant application process;

Evaluate grant applications and make recommendations to the department;

Communicate acceptance or denial of grant applications to direct client service providers;

Monitor compliance with the terms and conditions of the grant;

Maintain records for each grant applicant and award; and

Coordinate activities and correspondence between the department and direct client service providers.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308; Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 2-4/SB 193.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “meet the definition of a contract management agency as defined in paragraph (3) of Code Section 31-2A-31 and shall” at the end of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 1-1/SB 193, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Untreated chlamydial infection has been linked to problems during pregnancy, including preterm labor, premature rupture of membranes, and low birth weight. The newborn may also become infected during delivery as the baby passes through the birth canal. Exposed newborns can develop eye and lung infections; and

“(2) Untreated gonococcal infection in pregnancy has been linked to miscarriages, premature birth and low birth weight, premature rupture of membranes, and chorioamnionitis. Gonorrhea can also infect an infant during delivery as the infant passes through the birth canal. If untreated, infants can develop eye infections.”

31-2A-34.
Services funded by program.

The services which shall be funded by the program include:

Medical care and information, including but not limited to pregnancy tests, sexually transmitted infection tests, other health screenings, ultrasound service, prenatal care, and birth classes and planning;

Nutritional services and education;

Housing, education, and employment assistance during pregnancy and up to one year following a birth;

Adoption education, planning, and services;

Child care assistance if necessary for the client to receive pregnancy support services;

Parenting education and support services for up to one year following a birth;

Material items which are supportive of pregnancy and childbirth, including but not limited to cribs, car seats, clothing, formula, or other safety devices; and

Information regarding health care benefits, including but not limited to available Medicaid coverage for the client for pregnancy care that provides health coverage for the client’s child upon his or her birth.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised language and punctuation throughout this Code section.

31-2A-35.
Grants.

Grants shall be awarded annually on a competitive basis to direct client service providers who display competent experience in providing any of the services included in Code Section 31-2A-34 pursuant to guidelines and criteria established pursuant to this article.

The department shall, with input from the agency, determine the maximum grant amount to be awarded to each direct client service provider, and such grant amount shall not exceed 85 percent of the annual revenue for the prior year of any provider.

The grant agreement entered into between the agency and a direct client service provider shall stipulate that the grant shall be used to provide any or all pregnancy support services at the discretion of the service provider pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-34. The agreement shall further stipulate that a direct client service provider shall not perform, promote, or act as a referral for an abortion, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (9) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-2A-36, and that grant funds shall not be used to promote or be otherwise expended for political or religious purposes, including, but not limited to, counseling or written material. Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit any direct client service provider from promoting or expending nongrant funds for a political or religious purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-35

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308; Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 2-5/SB 193.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “any of” in the middle of subsection (a); and, in subsection (c), in the first sentence, inserted “any or all” and inserted “at the discretion of the service provider”, and added the third sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 764, § 1-1/SB 193, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Untreated chlamydial infection has been linked to problems during pregnancy, including preterm labor, premature rupture of membranes, and low birth weight. The newborn may also become infected during delivery as the baby passes through the birth canal. Exposed newborns can develop eye and lung infections; and

“(2) Untreated gonococcal infection in pregnancy has been linked to miscarriages, premature birth and low birth weight, premature rupture of membranes, and chorioamnionitis. Gonorrhea can also infect an infant during delivery as the infant passes through the birth canal. If untreated, infants can develop eye infections.”

31-2A-36.
Criteria for grant consideration.

In order to be considered for a grant under this article, each direct client service provider shall:

Be a nonprofit organization incorporated in this state with a tax-exempt status pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

Have a primary mission of promoting healthy pregnancy and childbirth;

Have a system of financial accountability consistent with generally accepted accounting principles, including an annual budget;

Have a board that hires and supervises a director who manages the organization’s operations;

Have provided pregnancy support services for a minimum of one year;

Offer, at a minimum, pregnancy tests and counseling for women who are or may be experiencing unplanned pregnancies;

Provide confidential and free pregnancy support services;

Provide each pregnant client with accurate information on the developmental characteristics of babies and of unborn children, including offering the printed materials described in Code Section 31-9A-4 on fetal development and assistance available following a birth;

Ensure that grant money is not used to encourage or affirmatively counsel a client to have an abortion unless the client’s attending physician diagnoses a condition which makes such abortion necessary to prevent her death; to provide her an abortion; or to directly refer her to an abortion provider for an abortion; and

Maintain confidentiality of all data, files, and records of clients related to the services provided and in compliance with state and federal laws.

The department shall publish the direct client service provider criteria on its website.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-36

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308.

31-2A-37.
Record maintenance and reporting.

Each direct client service provider shall maintain accurate records and report data to the agency annually on forms and in the manner required by the department. Reports shall include the number of clients who:

Utilized pregnancy support services;

Are pregnant;

Chose childbirth after receiving pregnancy support services;

Chose adoption after receiving pregnancy support services; and

Chose abortion after receiving pregnancy support services.

Each provider may be required to provide other information and data at the discretion of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308.

31-2A-38.
Confidentiality.

Confidentiality of all data, files, and records of clients related to the services provided under this article shall be maintained by the department, contract management agency, and direct client service providers pursuant to federal and state laws related to privacy of medical records, including requirements under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-38

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308.

31-2A-39.
Annual audit.

The agency shall conduct an annual audit of each direct client service provider by an independent certified public accountant within 120 days of the completion of its fiscal year verifying that it has complied with all requirements of this article and any other requirements of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-39

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308.

31-2A-40.
Reports to the General Assembly.

The department shall annually report to the General Assembly on its use of trust funds appropriated to the department pursuant to this article.

The department shall also provide an annual report no later than September 30 of each year beginning September 30, 2017, which shall provide the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year:

The amount of any contributions or other funding received;

The total amount of expenses; and

The amount of trust funds disbursed through the agency to direct client service providers.

The reports required by this Code section shall be made available to the public free of charge by electronic means and in such other manner as the department deems appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308.

31-2A-41.
Acceptance of donations, contributions, and gifts.

The department is authorized to accept donations, contributions, and gifts and receive, hold, and use grants, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property on behalf of the state to enable the department to carry out the functions and purposes of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2A-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 214, § 2/SB 308.